Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1145
Permits; term; department; adopt rules and regulations.

(1) Permits issued for the administration of general anesthesia or deep sedation, moderate sedation, or minimal sedation pursuant to the Dentistry Practice Act shall be valid until March 1 of the next odd-numbered year after issuance. A permit issued for the administration of general anesthesia prior to July 1, 2016, shall remain valid subject to the Dentistry Practice Act until March 1 of the next odd-numbered year, and it may be renewed subject to the Dentistry Practice Act as a general anesthesia or deep sedation permit. A permit issued for the administration of parenteral sedation prior to July 1, 2016, shall remain valid subject to the Dentistry Practice Act until March 1 of the next odd-numbered year, and it may be renewed subject to the Dentistry Practice Act as a moderate sedation permit.

(2) The department, with the recommendation of the board, shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to define criteria for the reevaluation of credentials, facilities, equipment, dental hygienists, and dental assistants and procedures of a previously qualified dentist to renew his or her permit for each subsequent renewal.

Laws 1986, LB 438, § 11;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 34;

Laws 1999, LB 800, § 10;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 38;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-193.31;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 478;

Laws 2015, LB80, § 15.